Tennessee, session 114, HB0011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The department of safety shall redesign driver licenses, instruction permits,
intermediate driver licenses, and photo identification licenses issued to lawful permanent
residents of the United States pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-
303(a)(9), and the temporary licenses and permits described in Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 55-50-331(g), so that they may be easily distinguished from driver
licenses, instruction permits, intermediate driver licenses, and photo identification
licenses issued to residents of this state who are United States citizens. The driver
licenses, instruction permits, intermediate driver licenses, photo identification licenses,
and temporary licenses and permits must be printed on a visually distinctive colored
background.
(b) The department of safety shall begin issuing the redesigned licenses and
permits to qualified applicants no later than January 1, 2026.
(c) The person issued or for whom was renewed a license or permit pursuant to
subsection (a) is entitled to the same driving privileges and, if applicable, is subject to
the same restrictions authorized by the previously issued license or permit. The
redesigned license or permit must also be accepted as proof of identity in the same
manner as the previously issued license or permit.
HB0011
000254
- 1 -

(d) A person issued or for whom was renewed a license or permit pursuant to
subsection (a) who, upon renewal of the license or permit, submits documentation that
the applicant is a citizen of the United States pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated,
Section 55-50-321(c)(1)(C)(i), shall be issued a license or permit that is the same design
as the license or permit issued to residents of this state who are United States citizens.
SECTION 2. For purposes of redesigning licenses and permits, this act takes effect
upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect
January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000254